Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1550.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 6144. Parole for reasons of age.(a) Eligibility criteria.--The board may grant parole to an incarcerated individual upon petition filed by either the department or the incarcerated individual if all of the following criteria are satisfied:(1) The incarcerated individual has attained a minimum age of 50 years and has served either a minimum of 25 years of imprisonment or one-half of the minimum sentence imposed for the offense for which the individual is currently incarcerated, whichever is less.123456789101112131415161718 (2) The board determines that the incarcerated individual would not currently present a danger to other people or the general public if released on parole.(b) Notice to department.--If an incarcerated individual files a petition for parole under subsection (a), the incarcerated individual shall provide a copy of the petition to the department no later than seven business days after filing the petition with the board.(c) Notice to victims.--Within 30 business days of receipt of a petition filed by an incarcerated individual under subsection (a), or upon the filing of a petition by the department on behalf of an incarcerated individual under subsection (a), the board shall, subject to applicable confidentiality provisions, take all of the following actions:(1) Provide written notice to the Office of Victim Advocate and any registered victim of the incarcerated individual's offense, informing the victim of the petition and stating the general basis for the petition.(2) Afford the Office of Victim Advocate and any registered victim of the incarcerated individual's offense a period of 60 days to submit a written response to the board regarding the petition.(d) Duties of board.--(1) The board shall, when issuing a decision on the petition submitted under subsection (a), consider all of the following:(i) A response to the petition by the Office of Victim Advocate and any registered victim of the incarcerated individual's offense.(ii) Recommendations by the secretary, if any.20250HB1550PN1834 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The incarcerated individual's offense that resulted in the conviction.(iv) The incarcerated individual's sentence and time served for the conviction.(v) The incarcerated individual's current age, physical and mental condition and ability to function within a correctional environment.(vi) The incarcerated individual's postrelease care plan if a plan exists.(vii) The incarcerated individual's disciplinary record, a full set of records of accomplishments and any records demonstrating rehabilitation while incarcerated.(viii) The likelihood that the incarcerated individual would pose a danger to others or the general public if released. Based on physical and mental health, employability, good behavior, leadership roles, documented rehabilitation and number and array of support letters from individuals within and outside the correctional institutions where the incarcerated individual has resided.(2) In granting parole for a petition submitted under subsection (a), the board may impose any reasonable terms and conditions of parole specifically tailored to the circumstances relating to the sentence that is the least restrictive of the incarcerated individual's individual liberty.(e) Denial of petition.--If the board denies a petition for parole under subsection (d):(1) The incarcerated individual may file a habeas corpus petition in this Commonwealth challenging the denial. The 20250HB1550PN1834 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 court shall act upon the petition by holding a hearing within 60 days of receipt of the petition.(2) The incarcerated individual or the department may submit a petition for parole under subsection (a) for reconsideration by the board within 30 days of receipt of notice of the denial.(3) In addition to paragraph (2), the incarcerated individual or the department may submit a petition for parole under subsection (a) one year after the date that the initial petition was filed.(f) Reports.--No later than September 1, 2026, and each September 1 thereafter, the secretary shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives a report on petitions for parole under subsection (a) and shall make the report available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The report shall include a description of all of the following for the previous year:(1) The number of incarcerated individuals granted and denied parole, categorized by the criteria considered as the grounds for parole.(2) The number of petitions initiated by or on behalf of incarcerated individuals, categorized by the criteria considered as the grounds for parole.(3) The number of petitions that department employees assisted incarcerated individuals in drafting, preparing or submitting, categorized by the criteria considered as grounds for parole, and the final decision made in each petition.(4) The number of petitions filed by the department, 20250HB1550PN1834 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 categorized by the criteria considered as the grounds for parole, and the final decision made in each petition.(5) For each petition filed by the department based on the criteria under subsection (a)(1), the time elapsed between the date the incarcerated individual was diagnosed and the date the department filed the petition, categorized by the criteria considered as the grounds for parole, and the final decision made in each petition.(6) For each criteria specified under subsection (a), the number of incarcerated individuals who died while a petition for parole was pending.(7) The number of visits to terminally ill incarcerated individuals that were denied by the department due to security or other concerns, and the reasons given for the denials.(8) Costs associated with room, board, legal, medical and other expenses related to the care of incarcerated individuals who are at least 50 years of age, inclusive of department labor and overhead.(9) Disabilities, both permanent and temporary and physical and intellectual, degree of mobility, neurodivergence and mental illness of incarcerated individuals.(10) Violent acts documented prior to or during time served, versus convictions of violent offenses where there was no evidence of physical or psychological harm to others.(11) Certifications, training, degrees or course work from accredited entities, apprenticeships, published works, programs participated in or completed, work experience and formal mentorship.20250HB1550PN1834 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Regulations.--The board and the department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.§ 6145. Medical parole under certain circumstances.If a public or disaster emergency related to health is declared or a contagious disease outbreak occurs in a facility of the department which outbreak cannot protect vulnerable individuals, the board may grant medical parole to an incarcerated individual who, due to the incarcerated individual's age or underlying health conditions, is at risk of serious complications or death should the incarcerated individual contract the disease. The board may use any expedited review process when granting medical paroles under this section if, in the discretion of the board, it is necessary and appropriate to release incarcerated individuals in a timely fashion.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1550PN1834 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516